Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the State Department of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of
$5,986,843 for operations of the department.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received  by the State Department of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the following purposes:
(1) Geologic survey......................... $ 2,648,281
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 4,221,055
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,927,333 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2021
Act, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5010 (HB 5010-A) Page 2